Utah statutes.
77-2-6.   Dismissal after compliance with diversion agreement.
The court shall dismiss the information or indictment filed against the
defendant who has complied with the requirements of his diversion agreement
and the defendant shall not thereafter be subject to further prosecution for
the offense involved or for any lesser included offense.
